Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325E.048] SINGLE-USE PLASTICS; HOTELS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Hotel" has the meaning given in section 157.15, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (c) "Single-use plastic bottle" means a plastic bottle or container that is intended to be used once by a consumer before disposing or recycling. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin A hotel is prohibited from selling, offering for sale, or providing to the hotel's customers a single-use plastic bottle containing shampoo or conditioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Enforcement; civil penalty. new text end new text begin (a) The owner of a hotel that violates subdivision 2 is subject to a civil penalty of $50 for each single-use plastic bottle containing shampoo or conditioner sold, offered for sale, or provided to the hotel's customers, up to a maximum penalty of $10,000, and may be enjoined from the violation. new text end new text begin (b) The attorney general may enforce this section under section 8.31. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end